Hawaii statutes.
[§291C-221.5] High occupancy vehicle lanes;
emergencies. (a) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, when a roadway
includes one or more lanes for traffic moving in the same direction that
include a high occupancy vehicle lane or zipper lane, and at least one lane
other than a high occupancy vehicle lane or zipper lane is closed by law
enforcement officers or emergency services personnel because of a traffic
incident or accident, any motor vehicle, regardless of the number of persons
carried, that can safely enter the high occupancy vehicle lane or zipper lane
shall, subject to subsection (b), be allowed to use the high occupancy vehicle
lane or zipper lane.

(b) For the purposes of subsection (a), the
director of transportation shall have the authority to declare an emergency to
open the use of high occupancy vehicle lanes and zipper lanes to all motor
vehicles regardless of the number of persons carried.

(c) For the purposes of this section:

"Accident" means an unplanned event
involving a motor vehicle, resulting in damage to one or more motor vehicles,
property damage, or personal injury.

"Incident" includes any accident or
issue that disrupts the flow of traffic. [L 2009, c 82, §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next